fi: Venttiilisuojuksen kattama alue: Sormikoukun alue; Koko venttiilikoneiston suojus; Suuputken alue; Venttiilipainikkeet (ylä); Venttiilihatut (alahatut); Venttiilikotelo/-koneisto; Venttiiliputkien alue; Muu
pt-PT: Área de cobertura da proteção da válvula: Área do gancho de dedo; Revestimento total da secção das válvulas; Área do tubo principal; Botões das válvulas (parte superior); Tampas das válvulas (tampas inferiores); Corpo/bloco das válvulas; Área das corrediças das válvulas; Outro
es: Área de cobertura del protector de la válvula: Área del gancho para el dedo; Envoltura completa de la sección de válvulas; Área del tudel; Botones de válvula (superior); Tapas de válvula (tapas inferiores); Carcasa/grupo de válvulas; Área de las bombas de las válvulas; Otro
de: Anwendungsbereich des Ventilschutzes: Fingerhaken-Bereich; Komplette Ventilblock-Umwicklung; Mundrohr-Bereich; Ventilknöpfe (oben); Ventilkappen (untere Kappen); Ventilgehäuse/-block; Ventilzug-Bereich; Sonstiges
fr: Zone couverte par le protège-soupape: Zone du crochet d’auriculaire; Enveloppe complète de la section des pistons; Zone de la branche d’embouchure; Boutons de piston (haut); Chapeaux de piston (bas); Bloc/chambres de pistons; Zone des coulisses de pistons; Autre
pl: Obszar pokrycia osłony zaworu: Obszar haka na palec; Pełna osłona sekcji wentyli; Obszar rurki ustnikowej; Przyciski wentyli (góra); Nakrętki wentyli (dolne nakrętki); Blok wentyli; Obszar krąglików; Inne
zh-CN: 活塞护罩覆盖区域: 指钩区; 整个活塞组包裹; 吹口管区; 活塞按键 (顶部); 活塞盖 (底部盖); 活塞套管/组; 活塞滑管区; 其他
bg-BG: Зона на покритие на предпазителя на клапана: Зона на куката за пръст; Цялостно покритие на клапанната секция; Зона на водещата тръба; Бутони на клапаните (отгоре); Капачки на клапаните (долни капачки); Корпус/блок на клапаните; Зона на плъзгачите на клапаните; Друго
hu: Szelep védőterülete: Ujjkampó területe; Teljes szelepház-burkolat; Fúvókacső területe; Szelepgombok (felső); Szelepkupakok (alsó kupakok); Szelepház / Szelepcsoport; Szelepcsúszkák területe; Egyéb
ru: Зона защиты клапана: Область крючка для пальца; Полная обмотка блока клапанов; Область мундштучной трубки; Кнопки клапанов (верхние); Крышки клапанов (нижние); Корпус/блок клапанов; Область крон клапанов; Другое
nb: Dekningsområde for ventilvern: Fingerkrok-område; Full ventilomslag; Munnrørområde; Ventilknapper (topp); Ventilhetter (bunndeksler); Ventilhus/-blokk; Ventilbøyleområde; Annet
ro-RO: Zonă de acoperire a protecției pentru supape: Zona inelului pentru deget; Protecție completă a blocului de pistoane; Zona tubului principal; Butoane pistoane (partea de sus); Capace pistoane (capace inferioare); Carcasa pistoanelor / bloc pistoane; Zona tuburilor de acordaj; Altele
en: Valve guard coverage area: Finger hook area; Full valve section wrap; Leadpipe area; Valve buttons (top); Valve caps (bottom caps); Valve casing/cluster; Valve slides area; Other
nl: Dekkingsgebied ventielbeschermer: Vingerhaakgedeelte; Volledige ventielsectiewikkel; Mondbuisgedeelte; Ventieldoppen (bovenkant); Ventieldoppen (onderkant); Ventielhuis/cluster; Ventielbuizengedeelte; Overig
vi: Vùng bảo vệ của tấm che van: Khu vực móc ngón tay; Bọc toàn bộ phần van; Khu vực ống dẫn chính; Nút van (trên cùng); Nắp van (nắp dưới); Vỏ/cụm van; Khu vực ống trượt van; Khác
lt-LT: Vožtuvo apsaugos padengimo medžiaga: Piršto kabliuko sritis; Visos vožtuvų dalies apvyniojimas; Pagrindinio vamzdžio sritis; Vožtuvų mygtukai (viršuje); Vožtuvų dangteliai (apatiniai dangteliai); Vožtuvų korpusas / blokas; Vožtuvų slankiklių sritis; Kita
ja: バルブガードカバレッジエリア: フィンガーフック部分; バルブセクション全体; リードパイプ部分; バルブボタン (上部); バルブキャップ (ボトムキャップ); バルブケーシング/クラスター; バルブスライド部分; その他
it: Area di copertura della protezione della valvola: Area del gancio per il dito; Copertura completa della sezione dei pistoni; Area della canna di imbocco; Pulsanti dei pistoni (superiori); Tappi dei pistoni (inferiori); Blocco dei pistoni/Cilindri; Area delle pompe; Altro
hr-HR: Područje pokrivenosti štitnika ventila: Područje kuke za prst; Omotač cijelog dijela ventila; Područje glavne cijevi; Gumbi ventila (vrh); Čepovi ventila (donji čepovi); Kućište/blok ventila; Područje klizača ventila; Ostalo
cs: Oblast krytí chrániče ventilu: Oblast prstového háku; Obal celé sekce ventilu; Oblast ústnice; Tlačítka ventilu (nahoře); Krytky ventilů (spodní krytky); Pouzdro/blok ventilu; Oblast snížců ventilu; Jiné
da: Dækningsområde for ventilbeskyttelse: Område til fingerkrog; Fuld dækning af ventilsektion; Mundrørsområde; Ventilknapper (top); Ventildæksler (bunddæksler); Ventilhus/-klynge; Område for ventilbøjler; Andet
ko: 밸브 가드 커버 범위: 핑거 후크 영역; 전체 밸브 섹션 랩; 리드파이프 영역; 밸브 버튼(상단); 밸브 캡(하단 캡); 밸브 케이싱/클러스터; 밸브 슬라이드 영역; 기타
pt-BR: Área do revestimento da proteção da válvula: Área do gancho de dedo; Cobertura total da seção de válvulas; Área do tudel; Botões das válvulas (parte superior); Tampas das válvulas (tampas inferiores); Camisa da válvula/bloco; Área das pompas das válvulas; Outro
tr: Valf koruma kapsama alanı: Parmak kancası alanı; Tam valf bölümü sargısı; Ana boru (leadpipe) alanı; Valf düğmeleri (üst); Valf kapakları (alt kapaklar); Valf muhafazası/grubu; Valf sürgüsü alanı; Diğer
sl-SI: Območje pokritosti zaščite za ventile: Območje kavlja za prst; Ovoj celotnega dela z ventili; Območje ustnika; Gumbi ventila (zgoraj); Pokrovi ventila (spodnji pokrovi); Ohišje/sklop ventila; Območje potegov ventila; Drugo
th: พื้นที่ครอบคลุมของตัวป้องกันวาล์ว: บริเวณตะขอเกี่ยวนิ้ว; หุ้มส่วนวาล์วเต็ม; บริเวณท่อลีดไปป์; ปุ่มกดวาล์ว (ด้านบน); ฝาครอบวาล์ว (ฝาล่าง); ปลอก/กลุ่มวาล์ว; บริเวณสไลด์วาล์ว; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 活塞護套覆蓋範圍: 指鉤區域; 全活塞段包覆; 吹口管區域; 活塞按鍵 (頂部); 活塞蓋 (底蓋); 活塞套筒/閥體; 活塞調音管區域; 其他
sk-SK: Chránená oblasť ventilu: Oblasť háčika na prst; Úplný obal ventilovej časti; Oblasť ústnice; Tlačidlá ventilov (horné); Kryty ventilov (spodné kryty); Puzdro/blok ventilov; Oblasť ťahov ventilov; Iné
el: Περιοχή κάλυψης προστατευτικού βαλβίδας: Περιοχή γάντζου δακτύλου; Κάλυμμα όλου του τμήματος βαλβίδων; Περιοχή επιστόμιου σωλήνα; Κουμπιά βαλβίδων (επάνω); Καπάκια βαλβίδων (κάτω καπάκια); Περίβλημα/σύμπλεγμα βαλβίδων; Περιοχή ολισθητήρων βαλβίδων; Άλλο
sv: Täckningsområde för ventilskydd: Område vid fingerkrok; Omsluter hela ventildelen; Område vid munrör; Ventilknappar (övre); Ventillock (undre lock); Ventilhus/ventilpaket; Område vid bygel; Övrigt